Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB730.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 441.420 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No political subdivision of this Commonwealth, combination of subdivisions, or
regional jail authority shall build a new local correctional facility unless:
(a) The facility meets the approval or complies with the standards and
administrative regulations of the department promulgated pursuant to KRS
441.055;
(b) The construction results in a new facility with:
1. A minimum capacity of one hundred fifty (150) prisoner beds, except as
provided in subsection (5) of this section; or
2. If a larger facility is needed, more than one hundred fifty (150) prisoner
beds in fifty (50) bed increments; and
(c) Construction of the local correctional facility is approved by the construction
authority.
(2) Final authority for approval of plans for the construction of a local correctional
facility, or an addition to a local correctional facility shall rest with the construction
authority.
(3) The department shall pay for the architectural plans and engineering services
associated with any new local correctional facility approved by the construction
authority.
(4) The department may promulgate administrative regulations to create a fee schedule
for architectural plans and engineering services required for the construction of
local correctional facilities. A sample fee schedule for architectural plans and
engineering services may be developed by a committee consisting of department
personnel, architects, and construction managers.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b)1. of this section, KRS 441.430(3)(a) and (b), or
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:43 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1861
KRS 441.450(3)(b), or any other law relating to the minimum number of prisoner
beds, a political subdivision of this Commonwealth, combination of subdivisions,
or regional jail authority may construct a new facility to replace or rebuild a
facility that was destroyed or damaged beyond being fit for occupancy following a
catastrophic event, including but not limited to tornado, fire, and flood, if federal
funding is available to pay some or all of the cost of the facility. The replacement
facility is not required to have the same number of prisoner beds, the same
footprint, or be located in the same parcel of land as the facility it is intended to
replace.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/17/2025 7:43 PM Jacketed